Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
71-6902.02
Coercion to obtain abortion; prohibited;
denial of financial support; effect.

No parent, guardian, or any other
person shall coerce a pregnant woman to obtain an abortion. If a pregnant
woman is denied financial support by her parents, guardians, or custodians
due to her refusal to obtain an abortion, the pregnant woman shall be deemed
emancipated for purposes of eligibility for public assistance benefits, except
that such benefits may not be used to obtain an abortion.

Laws 2011, LB690, § 6.
August 27, 2011